Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2210
Professional relationship and liabilities.

Nothing contained in sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 shall be interpreted to abolish, repeal, modify, restrict or limit the law now in effect in this state applicable to the professional relationship and liabilities between the person furnishing the professional services and the person receiving such professional services or to the standards of professional conduct. Any officer, shareholder, agent or employee of a corporation organized under sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 shall remain personally and fully liable and accountable for any negligent or wrongful act or misconduct committed by him, or by any person under his direct supervision and control, while rendering professional service on behalf of the corporation to the person for whom such professional services were being rendered. The corporation shall be liable up to the full value of its property for any negligent or wrongful acts or misconduct committed by any of its officers, agents or employees while they are engaged on behalf of the corporation.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 10, p. 558.